Alabama, session 2026rs, HB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CREDIT CARD. A line of credit issued by a domestic
lender or credit card bank.
(2) DEBIT CARD. A card issued by a bank in relation to
a checking or savings account.
(b) The Sheriff of Escambia County, upon the
establishment of and compliance with all procedures and other
requirements set forth in this section, may make certain
purchases through the use of a credit card or debit card
issued to the Escambia County Sheriff's Office.
(c) The sheriff shall adopt written policies and
procedures governing the use of a credit card or debit card
which, at a minimum, shall include all of the following:
(1) A monetary limit on the amount of any individual
purchase made with a credit card or debit card.
(2) A monetary limit on the total monthly amount that
may be purchased with a credit card or debit card, taking into
consideration the monetary limit of the fund used.
(3) Procedures to ensure that the sheriff, or his or
her designee, has sole access to any credit card or debit card
or any card numbers, access codes, or security codes.
Page 1

or any card numbers, access codes, or security codes.
HB201 Enrolled
(4) Procedures to keep accurate records of all
purchases made with a credit card or debit card which shall be
periodically reviewed during required audits.
(5) Procedures to ensure that all credit card or debit
card bills are carefully reviewed by the sheriff each month to
ensure that no unauthorized charges appear on the bill.
(6) Procedures to ensure that all credit card or debit
card bills are paid in full on a timely basis each month to
avoid service charges, late fees, or interest payments.
(d) The sheriff, when selecting a credit card or debit
card provider, shall consider all of the following factors:
(1) Whether the credit card or debit card issuer
requires an annual fee for using the card.
(2) Whether the credit card or debit card issuer offers
rewards or rebates based upon purchases made using the
account.
(3) The interest rate, service charges, finance
charges, or late fees that may be assessed in the event a bill
from the credit card or debit card issuer is paid late or the
balance is not paid in full.
(4) Whether penalties or fees may be assessed against
the sheriff in the event he or she decides to terminate the
credit card or debit card.
(e) In the event a credit card or debit card provides
rewards or rebates based upon use of the card, any rewards or
rebates earned shall be deposited in the discretionary account
of the Escambia County Sheriff's Office.
(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize the Sheriff
Page 2

(f) Nothing in this section shall authorize the Sheriff
HB201 Enrolled
of Escambia County to expend funds in excess of those
otherwise validly appropriated under law nor to establish a
debt of the Escambia County Commission.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 3

2026.
HB201 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed



Page 4